Louisiana, session 2026, HB745.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
7 Section 1. R.S. 32:387.2(D) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
8 §387.2. Special permits; vehicles or tandem loads hauling divisible or nondivisible
9 container imports or exports to port facilities
10 * * *
11 D. The provisions of this Section and all legislative authority for the
12 existence of the permits authorized in this Section shall cease to exist on August 1,
13 2026 2030.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 1 of 1
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.